Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2016
Refresher course, defined.

Refresher course means a planned program of supervised educational training, approved by the board, that provides a review of medical knowledge and skills for the purpose of the enhancement of clinical competency.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 674.